Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7409.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 6-13.1 of the General Laws entitled "Deceptive Trade Practices" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
6-13.1-31. Credit card surcharge prohibited.
It shall be a deceptive trade practice in violation of this chapter for any retail establishment
offering goods or services for sale to impose a surcharge fee on a customer who uses a credit card
for a transaction occurring in the state.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004686
========